Florida, session 2026, HB6503.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. The facts stated in the preamble to this act
are found and declared to be true.
Section 2. The sum of $28 million is appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund to the Department of Children and Families
for the relief of L.P. for injuries and damages sustained.
Section 3. The Chief Financial Officer is directed to draw
a warrant in the sum of $28 million payable to a special needs
trust created for the exclusive use and benefit of L.P. for
injuries and damages sustained.
Section 4. The amount paid by the Department of Children
and Families pursuant to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the
amount awarded under this act are intended to provide the sole
compensation for all present and future claims arising out of
the factual situation described in this act which resulted in
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6503-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S

HB 6503 2026
injuries and damages to L.P. The total amount paid for attorney
fees, lobbying fees, and other similar expenses relating to this
claim may not exceed 25 percent of the total amount awarded
under this act.
Section 5. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6503-00